Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1417
County jail; examination; report.

The grand jury may at each term of the court at which they may be in attendance, visit the county jail, and examine and report its condition, as required by law.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 409, p. 816;

R.S.1913, § 9047;

C.S.1922, § 10071;

C.S.1929, § 29-1417;

R.S.1943, § 29-1417;

Laws 1959, c. 118, § 5, p. 451.

Jails, duty of grand juries and county boards to inspect, see section 47-108 et seq.